District of Columbia statutes.
7-173

Inspector of Fish and Other Marine Products.

The duties and the authority conferred by law upon the Inspector of Fish and Other Marine Products on May 26, 1908, are hereby vested in each of the Sanitary and Food Inspectors.

History

May 26, 1908, 35 Stat. 299, ch. 198

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-109.
1973 Ed., § 6-110.